Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Temporary Borrowings in Anticipation of Issuance of State-Supported Debt

§ 31-17-151.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Notes” shall mean notes, replacement notes, refunding notes or similar evidence of indebtedness.

“State-supported debt” shall mean any bonds or other evidence of indebtedness, including bonds to be issued to fund reserve funds and costs of issuance, as previously or hereinafter authorized, from time to time, to be issued by the state for which the state is or will be constitutionally obligated to pay debt service or is or will be contractually obligated to pay debt service subject to an appropriation; however, this definition shall not apply to debt issued by the Mississippi Development Bank or similar state agencies or authorities.

“State” shall mean the State of Mississippi.

“Commission” shall mean the State Bond Commission of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 170, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-153.
State Bond Commission authorized to make temporary borrowings in anticipation of issuance of state-supported debt.

Pending the issuance of any state-supported debt, the commission is hereby authorized in accordance with the provisions of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 and on the credit of the state, to make temporary borrowings, from time to time, in anticipation of the issuance of state-supported debt in order to provide funds in such amounts as may, from time to time, be deemed advisable prior to the issuance of state-supported debt. In order to provide for and in connection with such temporary borrowings, the commission is hereby authorized in the name and on behalf of the state, to enter into agreements, which agreements may contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181, with any banks, trust companies, investment banking firms or other institutions or persons in the United States of America having the power to enter the same:

To purchase or underwrite an issue or series of issues of notes.

To enter into any purchase, loan, line of credit, credit or similar agreements, and to draw monies, from time to time, pursuant to any such agreements on the terms and conditions set forth therein and to issue notes as evidence of borrowings made under any such agreements.

Such agreements may provide for the compensation of any purchasers or underwriters of such notes by payment of a fee or commission, and for all other costs and expenses, including fees for agreements related to the sale and issuance of notes. All costs and expenses of sale and issuance of notes may be paid from the proceeds of the notes or from any other lawfully available source of monies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 171, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-155.
Temporary borrowings to be evidenced by notes; security.

All temporary borrowings made under Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall be evidenced by notes of the state which shall be sold and issued, from time to time, at competitive or negotiated sale, for such amounts not exceeding in the aggregate the applicable statutory and constitutional debt limitation in connection with the related state-supported debt, in such form and in such denominations and subject to terms and conditions of sale and issuance, prepayment or redemption and maturity, variable and/or fixed rate or rates of interest, time of payment of interest and other applicable provisions as the commission shall authorize and direct and in accordance with Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181. All notes issued pursuant to Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 may be secured by a pledge of: (a) the same source of security as the related state-supported debt, or (b) such other security as the state may lawfully pledge, or both, all as provided by resolution of the commission. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, notes may be issued for any otherwise authorized state-supported debt. Except as otherwise provided in Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 or when in conflict with the provisions of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181, such notes shall be subject to the terms and provisions of the legislation authorizing the issuance of such state-supported debt.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 172, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-157.
Issuance of replacement notes.

The commission is authorized to provide for the subsequent issuance of replacement notes to refund, upon issuance thereof, such notes, and may specify such other terms and conditions with respect to the replacement notes thereby authorized for issuance as the commission may determine and direct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 173, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-159.
Payment of principal and interest.

The State Treasurer shall perform all acts and things necessary to pay or cause to be paid, when due, all principal of and interest on the notes and to assure that the same may draw upon any monies available for that purpose pursuant to any purchase, loan, line of credit, credit or similar agreements established with respect thereto, all subject to the authorization and direction of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 174, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-161.
Funding and retirement of temporary borrowings.

Outstanding notes evidencing such temporary borrowings shall be funded and retired by the issuance and sale of state-supported debt, from time to time, as determined by the commission and must be sold and issued not later than a date four (4) years after the date of issuance of the first notes evidencing such temporary borrowings to the extent that payment of such notes has not otherwise been made or provided for by sources other than proceeds of replacement notes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 175, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-163.
Proceeds of temporary borrowings paid to State Treasurer.

The proceeds of all such temporary borrowings shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be held and disposed of in accordance with such laws of the state authorizing the sale and issuance of the related state-supported debt.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 176, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-165.
Powers and authority of commission.

The commission is hereby authorized to do such other acts and enter into such other agreements as may be needed or be appropriate in connection with the sale, issuance and payment of the notes and any program developed by the commission in relation thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 177, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-167.
Purpose of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181.

The purpose of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 is to provide full and complete authority for the state, acting by and through the commission, for such temporary borrowings. No procedure or proceedings, publications, notices, consents, limitations, approvals, orders, acts or things, other than those required by Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181, shall be required for such temporary borrowings or to do any act or perform anything under Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 except as otherwise may be prescribed in Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181. The powers conferred by Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall not affect the powers conferred by any other law. Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 are remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 178, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-169.
Full and complete authority for all temporary borrowings.

This section and other applicable provisions of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full and complete authority for all such temporary borrowings by the state, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 179, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-171.
Nothing in Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 to be construed as applicable to obligations other than those that are state-supported.

Nothing in Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall be construed as to apply to or limit any debt obligation or related instrument of the state or any other issuers except those obligations or instruments which are or relate to state-supported debt.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 180, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-173.
Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 deemed to be full and complete authority for exercise of powers granted therein.

Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted, but Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 181, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-175.
Notes to be fully negotiable and shall be “securities” within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code.

All notes sold and issued under Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall be fully negotiable in accordance with their terms and shall be “securities” within the meaning of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, subject to the provisions of such notes pertaining to registration. It shall not be necessary to file financing statements or continuation statements to protect the lien and pledge granted by the state to the holders of any notes issued under Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 182, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-177.
Notes and income therefrom exempt from state taxation.

All notes sold and issued under the provisions of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 183, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-179.
Severability.

If any one or more sections, clauses, sentences or parts of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 shall for any reason be questioned in any court and shall be adjudged unconstitutional or invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remaining provisions of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181, but shall be confined in its operations to the specific provisions so held invalid, and inapplicability or invalidity of any such section, clause, sentence or part shall not be taken to affect or prejudice in any way the remaining part or parts of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 184, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).

§ 31-17-181.
Validation of notes.

Any notes sold and issued under the provisions of Sections 31-17-151 through 31-17-181 may, in the discretion of the commission, be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of municipal bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 185, eff from and after passage (approved November 24, 2004).